Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Article 3. Permits.

§ 59.1-387.
Permit required; exception.

No participant shall engage in any horse racing subject to the jurisdiction of the Commission or in the conduct of a race meeting or pari-mutuel wagering thereon, including but not limited to as a horse owner, trainer, jockey, exercise rider, groom, stable
foreman, valet, veterinarian, agent, pari-mutuel employee, concessionaire or employee thereof, track employee, or other positions the Commission deems necessary to regulate to ensure the integrity of horse racing in Virginia, unless
such person possesses a permit therefor from the Commission, and complies with the provisions of this chapter and all Commission regulations. No permit issued under the provisions of this chapter shall be transferable.

The Commission may waive the permit requirement for any person who possesses a valid permit or license to participate in the conduct of horse racing in another racing jurisdiction and participates in horse racing in Virginia on nonconsecutive racing days.

Once a horse is entered to run in Virginia, all participants shall come under the jurisdiction of the Commission and its stewards and shall be subject to regulations of the Commission and sanctions it or its stewards may impose.

History.
1988, c. 855; 1991, c. 591; 2000, c. 1011; 2005, c. 700.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 1011, redesignated the former single undesignated paragraph as present subsection A, and added new subsection B.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 700 substituted “participant shall engage” for “person shall participate” in the first sentence of subsection A; and added subsection C.

§ 59.1-388.
Application for permit.

Any person desiring to obtain a permit as required by this chapter shall make application therefor on a form prescribed by the Commission. The application shall be accompanied by a fee prescribed by the Commission.

Any application filed hereunder shall be verified by the oath or affirmation of the applicant.

History.
1988, c. 855.

§ 59.1-389.
Consideration of application.

The Commission shall promptly consider any application for a permit and issue or deny such permit based on the information in the application and all other information before it, including any investigation it deems appropriate. If an application for
a permit is approved, the Commission shall issue a permit, which shall contain such information as the Commission deems appropriate. Such permit shall be valid for one year; however, the permit of a licensee’s employee shall expire
automatically when such permit holder leaves the employment of the licensee or at the end of one year, whichever occurs first. The licensee shall promptly notify the Commission when a permit holder leaves the employment of the
licensee. The Commission shall establish criteria and procedures for permit renewal.

The Commission shall deny the application and refuse to issue the permit, which denial shall be final unless an appeal is taken under § 59.1-373, if it finds that the issuance of such permit to such applicant would not be in the interests of the people
of the Commonwealth, or the horse racing industry of the Commonwealth, or would reflect on the honesty and integrity of the horse racing industry in the Commonwealth, or that the applicant:

Has knowingly made a false statement of a material fact in the application, or has deliberately failed to disclose any information requested by the Commission;

Is or has been found guilty of any corrupt or fraudulent practice or conduct in connection with horse racing in this or any other state;

Has knowingly failed to comply with the provisions of this chapter or the regulations of the Commission;

Has had a permit to engage in activity related to horse racing denied for just cause, suspended or revoked in any other state, and such denial, suspension or revocation is still in effect; or

Is unqualified to perform the duties required for the permit sought.

The Commission shall deny the application and refuse to issue the permit if, within the five years immediately preceding the date of his application for the permit sought, the applicant has been convicted of a crime involving the unlawful conduct of wagering,
fraudulent use of a credential, unlawful transmission of information, touting, bribery, or administration or possession of drugs or any felony considered by the Commission to be detrimental to horse racing in the Commonwealth;
the denial shall be final unless an appeal is taken under § 59.1-373. Additionally, the Commission may deny the application and refuse to issue any permit, if the applicant has been convicted of any such crime committed prior to
the five years immediately preceding the date of his application.

The Commission may refuse to issue the permit if for any reason it feels the granting of such permit is not consistent with the provisions of this chapter or its responsibilities hereunder.

History.
1988, c. 855; 1991, c. 591; 1998, c. 619; 1999, c. 356.

§ 59.1-390.
Suspension or revocation of permit; fine.

The Commission, acting by and through its stewards or at a meeting at which a quorum is present, may suspend or revoke a permit issued under this chapter or fine the holder of such permit a sum not to exceed $10,000, or suspend a permit issued by this
chapter and fine the holder of such permit a sum not to exceed $10,000 after a hearing for which proper notice has been given to the permittee, in any case where it determines by a preponderance of the evidence that any provision
of this chapter, or any regulation or condition of the Commission, has not been complied with, or has been violated. The Commission may revoke such permit, after such hearing, if it finds that facts not known by it at the time
it was considering the application indicate that such permit should not have been issued. Deliberations of the Commission under this section shall be conducted pursuant to the provisions of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act
(§

2.2-3700

et seq.). If any permit is suspended or revoked, the Commission shall state its reasons for doing so, which shall be entered of record. Such action shall be final unless an appeal is taken in accordance with § 59.1-373.
Suspension or revocation of a permit by the Commission for any violation shall not preclude criminal liability for such violation.

The Commission, acting by and through its stewards, or at a meeting at which a quorum is present, may summarily suspend the permit of a person for a period of not more than 90 days pending a hearing and final determination by the Commission or its stewards,
if the Commission or its stewards determine the protection of the integrity of horse racing requires emergency action. The Commission or its stewards shall (i) schedule a hearing within 14 business days after the permit is summarily
suspended and (ii) notify the permit holder, not less than five business days before the hearing, of the date, time and place of the hearing.

History.
1988, c. 855; 1990, c. 456; 1991, c. 591; 1998, c. 619; 2005, c. 700.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 700, in the first sentence of subsection A, inserted “acting by and through its stewards or at a meeting at which a quorum is present,” “or suspend a permit issued by this chapter and fine the holder of such permit a sum not to
exceed $10,000” and substituted “determines by a preponderance of the evidence” for “has reason to believe”; and made minor stylistic changes.